Arkansas, session 2025, HB1579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-917(h)(1), concerning when a sex
offender or sexually dangerous person may request a risk level reassessment,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) However, an incarcerated person shall not be eligible
for reassessment until his or her release from incarceration.









*CEB173*
02/24/2025 2:21:01 PM CEB173